Washington statutes.
RCW 43.136.021

"Tax preference" defined.

As used in this chapter, "tax preference" means an exemption, exclusion, or deduction from the base of a state tax; a credit against a state tax; a deferral of a state tax; or a preferential state tax rate.

[ 2006 c 197 s 2.]